Utah statutes.
59-10-516.   Filing extension -- Payment of tax -- Penalty -- Foreign residency.

(1) (a)  The commission shall allow a taxpayer an extension of time for filing a return.

(b) (i)  For a return filed by a taxpayer except for a partnership, the extension under Subsection (1)(a) may not exceed six months.

(ii)  For a return filed by a partnership, the extension under Subsection (1)(a) may not exceed five months.

(2) (a)  Except as provided in Subsection (2)(b), the commission may not impose on a taxpayer during the extension period prescribed under Subsection (1) a penalty under Section 59-1-401 if the taxpayer pays, on or before the 15th day of the fourth month following the close of the taxpayer's taxable year, the lesser of:

(i)  90% of the total tax reported on the return for the current taxable year; or

(ii)  100% of the total tax liability for the taxable year immediately preceding the current taxable year.

(b)  If a taxpayer fails to meet the requirements of Subsection (2)(a), the commission may apply to the total balance due a penalty as provided in Section 59-1-401.

(3)  If a federal income tax return filing is lawfully delayed pending a determination of qualification for a federal tax exemption due to residency outside of the United States, a taxpayer shall file a return within 30 days after that determination is made.

